Utah statutes.
61-2f-405.   Criminal penalties for violation of chapter -- Other penalties.
(1) (a)  An individual required to be licensed under this chapter who violates
this chapter, in addition to being subject to a license sanction or a fine
ordered by the commission, is, upon conviction of a first violation, guilty of
a class A misdemeanor.
(b)  For a conviction under this Subsection (1), imprisonment shall be for a
term not to exceed six months.
(2) (a)  Upon conviction of a second or subsequent violation, an individual is
guilty of a third degree felony.
(b)  Imprisonment for a conviction under this Subsection (2)(a) shall be for a
term not to exceed two years.
(3)  An officer or agent of a corporation, a member or agent of a partnership
or association, or an individual in a similar position of another type of
entity who personally participates in or is an accessory to any violation of
this chapter by the entity is subject to the penalties prescribed for an
individual.
(4)  If a person receives money or its equivalent, as commission,
compensation, or profit by or in consequence of a violation of this chapter,
that person is liable for an additional penalty of not less than the amount of
the money received and not more than three times the amount of money received,
as may be determined by the court.  This penalty may be sued for in any court
of competent jurisdiction, and recovered by any person aggrieved for the
person's own use and benefit.
(5)  A fine imposed by the commission and the director under this chapter
shall, notwithstanding Section 13-1-2, be deposited into the Real Estate
Education, Research, and Recovery Fund to be used in a manner consistent with
the requirements of Part 5, Real Estate Education, Research, and Recovery Fund
Act.
